District of Columbia statutes.
2-1712

Funding.

All projected expenditures required for the administration of this chapter shall be included as a part of the annual budget submitted for the operation of the Office of the Secretary.

History

Sept. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-19, § 13, 32 DCR 3590

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2912.